Utah statutes.
53A-11-1403.   Eligibility -- Military children.
(1)  A school district or charter school may not charge tuition to a military
child placed in the care of a non-custodial parent or other person standing in
loco parentis who lives in a jurisdiction other than that of the custodial
parent.
(2)  A transitioning military child, placed in the care of a non-custodial
parent or other person standing in loco parentis who lives in a jurisdiction
other than that of the custodial parent, may continue to attend the school in
which the military student was enrolled while residing with the custodial
parent.
